Maine, session 132, LD232.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2353, sub-§1, as corrected by RR 1999, c. 2, §§30 to 32 and
affected by §33, is amended to read:
1. Weight limits. Except as provided in subsection 1-A and in section 2355, the
following gross vehicle weight limits apply to vehicles operating on a public way:
A. For a 2-axle vehicle, 34,000 pounds;
B. For a 3-axle vehicle or combination of vehicles, 54,000 pounds;
C. For a 4-axle vehicle or combination of vehicles and, except as provided by section
2364, for single unit vehicles of 5 or more axles, 69,000 pounds;
D. Except as provided in paragraph E, section 2354, section 2357, subsection 4 and
section 2365 for combination vehicles with 5 or more axles, 80,000 pounds; and
E. For a combination of 3-axle truck tractor and tri-axle semitrailer, 100,000 pounds.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §2353, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Weight limit on Route 46 in Town of Eddington. A motor vehicle operating
on Route 46 in the Town of Eddington may not exceed a gross vehicle weight of 33,000
pounds.
Sec. 3. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.